Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 4

Housing Funds

13-23-401. Assets fund.

There is hereby created and established a segregated fund on the books of the agency to be known as the “assets fund.” This assets fund will consist of all funds of the agency which are not necessary to support the bond and note obligations of the agency and which can be withdrawn from the specific funds of the various bond resolutions of the agency, as provided under the requirements of the resolutions, and investment income from such funds. Such assets fund shall remain a general asset of the agency. From time to time, but at least annually, the assets fund will be evaluated by the bond finance committee of the agency with regard to liquidity, tax law requirements, and additional security for the agency's obligations. After such evaluation, all available investment income and appropriate principal can be transferred to the housing program fund and the housing program reserve fund created elsewhere in this part. Funds in the assets fund shall be used only for the following purposes:

To invest in all legal investments allowed under state law and the bond resolution to satisfy the agency's obligations of bond and noteholders;

To support the existing rental rehabilitation program which is supported by federal funds administered by the agency;

For construction loans for housing as otherwise authorized in this part; provided, that such loans pay interest at a rate comparable to earnings on other permitted investments; and

As a reserve to support the bond and loan programs of the Tennessee industrial finance corporation, created pursuant to title 4, chapter 17, part 4 [repealed].

It is the legislative intent that these funds not be depleted through any program of grants or subsidies. Furthermore, these funds shall not be commingled with the proceeds of any bond issue of the agency which are required to be held by the trustee.

The board of directors of the agency may withdraw such funds from the assets fund as it deems necessary.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, at year end of the fiscal year ending June 30, 1998, an amount not to exceed sixty-five million dollars ($65,000,000) of the unexpended balance of the funds in the assets fund may, at the discretion of the commissioner of finance and administration, be transferred to the state general fund. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that the transfer authorized herein shall be mitigated to the fullest extent possible pursuant to the applicable provisions contained in the general appropriations act for the year ending June 30, 1998.

Beginning in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1998, funds received by the agency pursuant to former § 13-23-402(a)(2) and (3) in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) each fiscal year shall be transferred to the assets fund until the assets fund has a fiscal year end balance of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000). Thereafter, no such funds shall be transferred to the assets fund but shall be applied in accordance with § 13-23-403.

Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 10; 1997, ch. 537, § 1; 1998, ch. 724, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 13-23-402(a)(2) and (3), referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 983, § 1.

Title 4, chapter 17, part 4, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 198, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

13-23-402. Creation of housing program fund — Reallocation of revenues.

There is hereby created and established a housing program fund to be administered by the agency and to consist of the following:

Moneys transferred from the assets fund; and

Such allocation of federal block grant or other federal funds as may be available and properly directed for housing programs.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1997, all allocations of tax revenues directed to the agency by former subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) in excess of six million dollars ($6,000,000) shall be reallocated to the state general fund; and, notwithstanding subsection (a), for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1998, all allocations of tax revenues directed to the agency by former subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) in excess of nine million dollars ($9,000,000) shall be reallocated to the state general fund. Thereafter, no such reallocation shall be made.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), or any other provision of law to the contrary, for a period of one (1) year beginning with the fiscal year starting July 1, 1999, all allocations of tax revenues directed to the agency by former subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) shall be reallocated to the state general fund.

Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 10; 1991, ch. 211, § 1; 1997, ch. 537, § 2; 1998, ch. 816, § 1; 1999, ch. 411, § 1; 2000, ch. 983, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former subdivisions (a)(2) and (3), regarding allocations of tax revenues directed to the agency, were repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 983, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.

Attorney General Opinions. Allocation of real estate transfer and mortgage taxes, OAG 97-032, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (3/31/97).

13-23-403. Allocations from housing program fund.

Moneys in the housing program fund shall be allocated by the agency for the following purposes:

To fund the operating and administrative costs of the agency;

To pay certain expenses of bond issues and to support future bond issues by making additions to the loan funds, in order to make loans at a lower interest rate for targeted low income and special need groups, when determined appropriate by the bond finance committee and approved by the board;

To make grants to local housing programs administered by eligible political subdivisions subject to one-to-one matching funds provided by each participant during the initial phase of the allocation process administered by the agency. The agency may prescribe the manner in which such grant funds are to be allocated to local housing programs, considering such factors as population, the adequacy of the existing housing stock to serve very low and low income households, and such other factors as may be deemed reasonable and appropriate by the agency. The agency shall establish a minimum grant amount to ensure that a viable housing program can be established by each eligible local housing program. In counties under one hundred thousand (100,000) in population, the agency may limit participation to one (1) local housing program; and

To the extent that funds still remain in the housing program fund after all eligible political subdivisions applying have been awarded grants, the agency may utilize any such remaining funds for demonstration housing projects on the basis of such competitive factors as level of income to be served, cost of the housing relative to average costs in the applicable area, amount of leveraging of public and private funds, amount of local match, if any, and innovative aspects of the project, except that funds accruing prior to fiscal year end but not reported to the department of revenue until the beginning of the next fiscal year can be used to fund projects submitted during the fiscal year.

Special consideration shall also be given to projects to be administered by qualified not-for-profit corporations in areas of the state which would otherwise go unserved by the state's housing program fund.

It is further provided that grants provided to local programs under subdivisions (a)(3) and (4) shall not be pledged as support for tax exempt borrowing by such local programs, but must be used to directly subsidize the cost of providing housing to very low and low income households.

Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 10; 1990, ch. 979, § 2; 1991, ch. 466, §§ 4, 5; 1995, ch. 533, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 537, §§ 3, 4; 1998, ch. 724, § 2; 2013, ch. 198, § 1.

13-23-404. Housing program reserve fund — Pilot program.

There is hereby created and established a housing program reserve fund to be administered by the agency, which will consist of moneys transferred from the housing program fund and the assets fund as set out in this part. No funds in the housing program reserve fund may revert to the state general fund, but shall remain available for the purposes set out in this part. Funds in the housing program reserve fund shall be invested in any investments permitted under state law, and the income from such investments is to be transferred to the housing program fund at least annually.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), in the fiscal year ending June 30, 1995, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) of the unexpended balance of the funds in the housing program reserve funds shall be transferred to the general fund.

Up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) per year may be transferred from the housing program reserve fund to the housing program fund for the purposes specified in § 13-23-403(a). Any such transfer must first be approved by the bond finance committee and the board, and such approvals must be based on a determination that such transfer is necessary to sustain the current funding levels of the grant programs of the agency, or that such transfer is necessary to accomplish a special program targeted to low income and/or special needs groups. No such funds transferred shall be used to finance or fund any multifamily rental projects. Any funds transferred pursuant to this subsection (c) shall not be subject to the requirements of former § 13-23-403(a)(2) [deleted]. In addition to the purposes specified in § 13-23-403(a), the transfer authorized in this subsection (c) is subject to the further limitation that it may be used only to support a pilot project to create, revitalize and preserve neighborhoods in up to three (3) urban areas and up to three (3) rural areas of the state. The pilot program shall exist only for three (3) years, through the end of the 1998-1999 fiscal year. The board shall report annually to the general assembly on the progress and success of the pilot program.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), at year end of the fiscal year ending June 30, 1998, all of the unexpended balance of funds in the housing program reserve fund shall be transferred to the state general fund. Once these funds have been transferred, the housing program reserve fund shall be abolished and this section shall be repealed.

Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 10; 1995, ch. 450, § 1; 1995, ch. 533, § 1; 1997, ch. 537, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 13-23-403(a)(2), referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 537, § 3, effective June 19, 1997.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

13-23-405. Local housing programs and funds.

Local housing programs may be established by any eligible political subdivision, as defined by § 13-23-103, except that for programs authorized by § 13-23-403(a)(4), an eligible political subdivision does include a municipality in a county which has applied for such program, or any local agency thereof which may be authorized to operate such programs pursuant to ordinance or resolution of the applicable legislative body. Such programs shall exist for the exclusive purpose of increasing the availability of adequate housing for very low, low and moderate income households, and may include new construction of housing units, rehabilitation of existing housing units and conversion of existing publicly owned or donated structures. When funds from the Tennessee housing development agency are being used by local housing programs to provide assistance, then the projects or activities shall comply with applicable rules and regulations of the agency.

Local matching funds may be made available to the local housing program by the legislative body of the eligible political subdivision.

Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 10; 1991, ch. 466, § 3.

13-23-406. Assistance to local housing programs.

In order to assist the local housing programs authorized pursuant to this part, the agency is authorized to:

Provide technical assistance to local programs;

Develop demonstration projects for serving very low, low and moderate income persons and families;

Encourage cost effective designs of very low, low and moderate income housing;

Provide rehabilitation and construction financing from the assets fund and the housing program reserve fund at rates consistent with this chapter;

Give priority for mortgage funds made available through the mortgage revenue bonds of the agency, to housing developed by local housing programs;

In conjunction with the department of correction, implement mutually beneficial housing assistance programs for development of additional housing for very low, low and moderate income households under this part, utilizing inmates and other vocational training resources; and

In conjunction with the department of economic and community development, support the funding of applications for community development block grants for housing submitted by eligible applicants for eligible projects.

Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 10.

13-23-407. Provisions controlling.

Insofar as this part is inconsistent with any other law, general, special, or local, this part is controlling.

Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 11.